Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.310

Terms for directors in divided districts.

Whenever all directors to be elected in a school district that is divided into directors' districts are not all to be elected for the same term of years, the county auditor, prior to the date set by law for filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of director, shall determine by lot the directors' districts from which directors shall be elected for a term of two years and the directors' districts from which directors shall be elected for a term of four years. In districts with a combination of directors' districts and directors at large, the county auditor shall determine the terms of office in such a manner that two-year terms and four-year terms are distributed evenly to the extent possible between the director district and at large positions. Each candidate shall indicate on his or her declaration of candidacy the directors' district from which he or she seeks to be elected or whether the candidate is seeking election as a director at large.

[ 1990 c 161 s 7; 1990 c 33 s 325; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.410. Prior: 1959 c 268 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.315.650, 28A.57.410, 28.57.410.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1990 c 33 s 325 and by 1990 c 161 s 7, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).